Massachusetts, session 194th, H4437.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 9 and 10 of chapter 262 of the 
Acts of 2012 or any other general or special law, the deadline for the adoption of any rule, 
regulation, or by-law relative to nutrient management and fertilizer guidelines adopted in the 
Town of Nantucket under chapter 561 of the acts of 1973, shall be extended for a period of two 
years after the effective date of this act. Such rule, regulation or bylaw shall not be less 
restrictive than regulations adopted by the department of agricultural resources under section 1 of 
chapter 262 and shall be done in conjunction with the University of Massachusetts Amherst 
Extension to ensure any regulations relative to plant nutrients are consistent with the program’s 
published information, educational materials and other public outreach programs relative to 
nutrient management and fertilizer guidelines. 

of 2 11  SECTION 2. The act shall take effect upon passage.